Massachusetts, session 194th, H644.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
Section 54B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after fifth paragraph the following new paragraph:-
“Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, no school
district shall prohibit students with epilepsy or other seizure inducing illness from possessing and
administering prescription anti-seizure medication in accordance with department of public
health regulations concerning students' self-administration of prescription medications.”
of 1